Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.630

Drug control assistance unit—Use of existing facilities and systems.

In order to maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of state resources, the drug control assistance unit shall, where feasible, use existing facilities and systems.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 63 s 4.]